Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-124
Department; provide relative consent form.

The department shall provide a form which may be signed by a relative indicating the fact that such relative consents to his or her name being released to such relative's adopted person as provided by sections 43-113, 43-119 to 43-146.16, 71-626, 71-626.01, and 71-627.02. Such consent shall be effective as of the time of filing the form with the department.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 24;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 72.